Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Housing development” means  multifamily housing or a mix of multifamily, middle
housing and single-family housing units planned, owned or constructed together through one
or more applications or development projects under  ORS 227.175 or a development agreement
under ORS 94.504 to 94.528.
(b) “Infrastructure project” means a  specific project for which funds are appropriated
under section 5 of this 2024 Act.
(c) “Workforce  income household” means a household with income less than or equal to
130 percent of the county median income  based on information or estimates available from
the United States Census Bureau.
(2) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall provide grants to cities for the
purpose of developing infrastructure projects.
Enrolled House Bill 4134 (HB 4134-B) Page 1
(3) To receive a grant under this section, a city must agree that:
(a) The infrastructure  project will be within the city’s urban growth boundary and will
contribute to the development of housing within the urban growth boundary;
(b) The  infrastructure project will be completed within 24 months of the disbursement
of the funds;
(c) The city has identified  a specific, planned housing development that will be primarily
benefited by the infrastructure project;
(d) The city has or will enter into an agreement with the property owner  of the housing
development as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(e) The city will assign to the state any moneys  or claims based on subsection (4)(c) of
this section; and
(f) The city will provide reports as required under section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(4) A city may not receive a disbursement of the grant until the city and  the property
owner of the identified  housing development have entered into one or more agreements to
provide that:
(a) The owner will construct a minimum specified number of housing units  before the
latter of  36 months after the completion of the infrastructure project or 60 months after the
disbursement of the infrastructure grant.
(b) No less than 30 percent of the dwelling units  within the housing development will be
subject to an affordable housing covenant, as defined in ORS 456.270, under which:
(A) The city shall serve as or designate the covenant holder; and
(B) The housing will  be made affordable to workforce income households for a period of
no less than 10 years.
(c) In addition to any other remedies, the owner is liable to repay to the city the amount
of the infrastructure grant under this section if the units  are not developed or the
affordability is not maintained as required in this subsection, except for  delays outside of the
owner’s control.
(d) The owner will assist the city in its reporting requirements  under section 2 of this
2024 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) Cities receiving grants under section 1 of this 2024 Act are  required to
provide two reports to the Oregon  Business Development Department, one within 24 months
and one within 60 months after moneys are distributed, on:
(a) The progress of the infrastructure project for which moneys were received;
(b) An estimated timeline of completion, or a report of the completed results;
(c) An accounting of the moneys spent and remaining for the project; and
(d) The number of housing units and affordable housing constructed  within the housing
development as described in section 1 (4) of this 2024 Act.
(2) On or before September 15 of each year, the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment shall provide a report to interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly on housing
in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245 summarizing the reports received under subsection
(1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there are  appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June  30,
2025, out of the General  Fund, to provide grants under section 1 of this 2024 Act, the fol-
lowing amounts:
(1) $3,000,000 to the City of  Burns for water, sewer and stormwater site improvements
for Miller Springs.
(2) $2,000,000 to the City of McMinnville for piping and pumps to activate a  water pump
station for developable lands.
Enrolled House Bill 4134 (HB 4134-B) Page 2
(3) $1,500,000 to the City of Amity for  stormwater infrastructure and road improvements
for residential housing development.
(4) $640,000 to the City of Toledo for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure im-
provements, as  well as a traffic study and road improvements along Sturdevant Road to
support a new apartment complex.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4134 (HB 4134-B) Page 3